Nevada, session 83, SB387.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that offers a policy of health insurance that
provides coverage for the treatment of lung cancer must provide
coverage for screening for lung cancer in accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning screening for lung cancer
which are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning screening for lung
cancer which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which are based on current or prevailing
supporting scientific data.
2. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 2. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that offers a policy of group health insurance
that provides coverage for the treatment of lung cancer must
provide coverage for screening for lung cancer in accordance
with:
(a) The guidelines concerning screening for lung cancer
which are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning screening for lung
cancer which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which are based on current or prevailing
supporting scientific data.
2. A policy of group health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
renewed on or after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by this section, and any provision
of the policy that conflicts with the provisions of this section is
void.
Sec. 4. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A carrier that offers a health benefit plan that provides
coverage for the treatment of lung cancer must provide coverage
for screening for lung cancer in accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning screening for lung cancer
which are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning screening for lung
cancer which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which are based on current or prevailing
supporting scientific data.
2. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 5. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 4 of this act to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 6. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A society that offers a benefit contract that provides
coverage for the treatment of lung cancer must provide coverage
for screening for lung cancer in accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning screening for lung cancer
which are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning screening for lung
cancer which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which are based on current or prevailing
supporting scientific data.
2. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the contract that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 7. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers a
policy of health insurance that provides coverage for the treatment
of lung cancer must provide coverage for screening for lung
cancer in accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning screening for lung cancer
which are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning screening for lung
cancer which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which are based on current or prevailing
supporting scientific data.
2. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 8. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health maintenance organization that offers a health
care plan that provides coverage for the treatment of lung cancer
must provide coverage for screening for lung cancer in
accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning screening for lung cancer
which are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning screening for lung
cancer which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which are based on current or prevailing
supporting scientific data.
2. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 9. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759, 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, and 695C.265 and section 8 of this act do not apply to a
health maintenance organization that provides health care services
through managed care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan
for Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health
Insurance Program pursuant to a contract with the Division of
Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and
Human Services. This subsection does not exempt a health
maintenance organization from any provision of this chapter for
services provided pursuant to any other contract.
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.16932 to 695C.1699,
inclusive, 695C.1701, 695C.1708, 695C.1728, 695C.1731,
695C.17333, 695C.17345, 695C.17347, 695C.1736 to 695C.1745,
inclusive, 695C.1757 and 695C.204 apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid.
6. The provisions of NRS 695C.17095 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to
members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
7. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to:
(a) The officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, of the governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of this State; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
 This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Sec. 10. NRS 695C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.330 1. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke any
certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the Commissioner finds
that any of the following conditions exist:
(a) The health maintenance organization is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document,
its health care plan or in a manner contrary to that described in and
reasonably inferred from any other information submitted pursuant
to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070 and 695C.140, unless any amendments
to those submissions have been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner;
(b) The health maintenance organization issues evidence of
coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services
which do not comply with the requirements of NRS 695C.1691 to
695C.200, inclusive, and section 8 of this act, 695C.204 or
695C.207;
(c) The health care plan does not furnish comprehensive health
care services as provided for in NRS 695C.060;
(d) The Commissioner certifies that the health maintenance
organization:
(1) Does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS
695C.080; or
(2) Is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care
services as required under its health care plan;
(e) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;
(f) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to
participate in matters relating to the content of programs pursuant to
NRS 695C.110;
(g) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect the system required by NRS 695C.260 for:
(1) Resolving complaints in a manner reasonably to dispose
of valid complaints; and
(2) Conducting external reviews of adverse determinations
that comply with the provisions of NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive;
(h) The health maintenance organization or any person on its
behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive or unfair manner;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(i) The continued operation of the health maintenance
organization would be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or to
the general public;
(j) The health maintenance organization fails to provide the
coverage required by NRS 695C.1691; or
(k) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed to
comply substantially with the provisions of this chapter.
2. A certificate of authority must be suspended or revoked only
after compliance with the requirements of NRS 695C.340.
3. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall
not, during the period of that suspension, enroll any additional
groups or new individual contracts, unless those groups or persons
were contracted for before the date of suspension.
4. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is revoked, the organization shall proceed, immediately
following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its
affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be
essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization.
It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation of any kind.
The Commissioner may, by written order, permit such further
operation of the organization as the Commissioner may find to be in
the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees are afforded
the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing coverage for
health care.
Sec. 11. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A managed care organization that offers a health care plan
that provides coverage for the treatment of lung cancer must
provide coverage for screening for lung cancer in accordance
with:
(a) The guidelines concerning screening for lung cancer
which are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning screening for lung
cancer which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which are based on current or prevailing
supporting scientific data.
2. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 11.5. NRS 695G.090 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the provisions of this chapter apply to each organization and insurer
that operates as a managed care organization and may include,
without limitation, an insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance, an insurer that issues a policy of individual or group
health insurance, a carrier serving small employers, a fraternal
benefit society, a hospital or medical service corporation and a
health maintenance organization.
2. In addition to the provisions of this chapter, each managed
care organization shall comply with:
(a) The provisions of chapter 686A of NRS, including all
obligations and remedies set forth therein; and
(b) Any other applicable provision of this title.
3. The provisions of NRS 695G.127, 695G.1639, 695G.164,
695G.1645, 695G.167 and 695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, and
section 11 of this act do not apply to a managed care organization
that provides health care services to recipients of Medicaid under
the State Plan for Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s
Health Insurance Program pursuant to a contract with the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 and 695G.1639 do not
apply to a managed care organization that provides health care
services to members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
5. Subsections 3 and 4 do not exempt a managed care
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Secs. 12-16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. On or before July 1, 2026, the Department of Health
and Human Services shall:
1. Conduct a study, which must include, without limitation, a
review of scientific publications, to determine if the criteria adopted
by the American Cancer Society relating to screening for lung
cancer results in inequity in access to such screening based on sex or
gender identity or expression.
2. Submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services a report of the conclusions of the study conducted
pursuant to subsection 1 and any recommendations for expanded
criteria to increase access to screening for lung cancer.
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
Sec. 19. 1. This section and sections 13, 17 and 18 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 12, inclusive, 14, 15 and 16 of this act become
effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)